District of Columbia statutes.
19-310

Brothers and sisters to share equally.

Each brother and sister of the intestate is entitled to an equal share, and the children or descendants of a brother or sister of the intestate, stand in the place of their deceased parents respectively.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 698, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 19-310.
1973 Ed., § 19-310.